Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.040

Division or redivision of district into director districts.

(1) It is the responsibility of each school district board of directors to prepare for the division or redivision of the district into director districts no later than eight months after any of the following:

(a) Receipt of federal decennial census data from the redistricting commission established in RCW 44.05.030;

(b) Consolidation of two or more districts into one district under RCW 28A.315.195;

(c) Transfer of territory to or from the district or dissolution and annexation of a district under RCW 28A.315.215; or

(d) Approval by a majority of the registered voters voting on a proposition authorizing the division of the district into director districts pursuant to RCW 28A.343.030.

(2) The districting or redistricting plan shall be consistent with the criteria and adopted according to the procedure established under RCW 29A.76.010.

[ 2012 c 186 s 16; 1991 c 288 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.315.593.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rule-making authority—2012 c 186: See RCW 28A.315.902.